Washington statutes.
RCW 8.12.410

Sale—Application of proceeds.

(1) The bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter or any portion thereof may be sold by any authorized officer or officers of the city at not less than their par value and accrued interest, and the proceeds thereof shall be applied in payment of the awards, interest and costs of the improvement.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such bonds may be sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 1983 c 167 s 13; 1915 c 154 s 12; RRS s 9264.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.